Utah statutes.
73-15-5.   Transfer of records and data to division -- Establishment of reporting and recordkeeping procedures.

All records and data collected by the department of meteorology of the state school of mines and mineral industries of the University of Utah since March 14, 1953, shall be transferred to the Division of Water Resources, there to be a permanent record. The Division of Water Resources shall establish forms and/or criteria for reporting data and record keeping and cause that a permanent record is kept of all pertinent data related to cloud-seeding projects, cloud-seeding research projects, or research related to other factors that may be affected by cloud-seeding activities.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

